California statutes. Public Resources Code
(c) (1) Through the consultation process described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (b), the
 division shall collaboratively identify and delineate the existing statutory authority and regulatory responsibility relating to well stimulation treatments and well stimulation treatment-related activities of the Department of Toxic Substances Control, the State Air Resources Board, any local air
 districts, the State Water Resources Control Board, the Department of Resources Recycling and Recovery, any regional water quality control board, and other public entities, as applicable. This shall specify how the respective authority, responsibility, and notification and reporting requirements associated with well stimulation treatments and well stimulation treatment-related activities are divided among each public entity.

(2) On or before January 1, 2015, the division shall enter into formal agreements with the Department of Toxic Substances Control, the State Air Resources Board, any local air districts where well stimulation treatments may occur, the State Water Resources Control Board, the Department of Resources Recycling and Recovery, and any regional water quality control board where well stimulation treatments may
 occur, clearly delineating respective authority, responsibility, and notification and reporting requirements associated with well stimulation treatments and well stimulation treatment-related activities, including air and water quality monitoring, in order to promote regulatory transparency and accountability.

(3) The agreements under paragraph (2) shall specify the appropriate public entity responsible for air and water quality monitoring and the safe and lawful disposal of materials in landfills, include trade secret handling protocols, if necessary, and provide for ready public access to information related to well stimulation treatments and related activities.

(4) Regulations, if necessary, shall be revised appropriately to incorporate the agreements under paragraph (2).

(d) (1) Notwithstanding any other law or regulation, before performing a well stimulation treatment on a well, the operator shall apply for a permit to perform a well stimulation treatment with the supervisor or district deputy. The well stimulation treatment permit application shall contain the pertinent data the supervisor requires on printed forms supplied by the division or on other forms acceptable to the supervisor. The information provided in the well stimulation treatment permit application shall include, but is not limited to, the following:

(A) The well identification number and location.

(B) The time period during which the well stimulation treatment is planned to occur.

(C) A water management plan that shall include all of the following:

(i) An estimate of the amount of water to be used in the treatment. Estimates of water to be recycled following the well stimulation treatment may be included.

(ii) The anticipated source of the water to be used in the treatment.

(iii) The disposal method identified for the recovered water in the flowback fluid from the treatment that is not produced water included in the statement pursuant to Section 3227.

(D) A complete list of the names, Chemical Abstract Service (CAS) numbers, and estimated concentrations, in percent by mass, of
 each and every chemical constituent of the well stimulation fluids anticipated to be used in the treatment. If a CAS number does not exist for a chemical constituent, the well owner or operator may provide another unique identifier, if available.

(E) The planned location of the well stimulation treatment on the wellbore, the estimated length, height, and direction of the induced fractures or other planned modification, if any, and the location of existing wells, including plugged and abandoned wells, that may be impacted by these fractures and modifications.

(F) A groundwater monitoring plan. Required groundwater monitoring in the vicinity of the well subject to the well stimulation treatment shall be satisfied by one of the following:

(i) The well is located within the boundaries of an existing oil or gas field-specific or regional monitoring program developed pursuant to Section 10783 of the Water Code.

(ii) The well is located within the boundaries of an existing oil or gas field-specific or regional monitoring program developed and implemented by the well owner or operator meeting the model criteria established pursuant to Section 10783 of the Water Code.

(iii) Through a well-specific monitoring plan implemented by the owner or operator meeting the model criteria established pursuant to Section 10783 of the Water Code, and submitted to the appropriate regional water board for review.

(G) The estimated amount of treatment-generated waste materials
 that are not reported in subparagraph (C) and an identified disposal method for the waste materials.

(2) (A) At the supervisor’s discretion, and if applied for concurrently, the well stimulation treatment permit described in this section may be combined with the well drilling and related operation notice of intent required pursuant to Section 3203 into a single combined authorization. The portion of the combined authorization applicable to well stimulation shall meet all of the requirements of a well stimulation treatment permit pursuant to this section.

(B) The time period available for approval of the combined authorization applicable to well stimulation is subject to the terms of this section, and not Section 3203.

(3) (A) The supervisor or district deputy shall review the well stimulation treatment permit application and may approve the permit if the application is complete. An incomplete application shall not be approved.

(B) A well stimulation treatment or repeat well stimulation treatment shall not be performed on any well without a valid permit that the supervisor or district deputy has approved.

(C) In considering the permit application, the supervisor shall evaluate the quantifiable risk of the well stimulation treatment.

(D) In the absence of state implementation of a regional groundwater monitoring program pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (h) of Section 10783 of the Water Code, the
 supervisor or district deputy may approve a permit application for well stimulation treatment pursuant to subparagraph (A) before the approval by the State Water Resources Control Board or a regional water quality control board of an area-specific groundwater monitoring program developed by an owner or operator pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (h) of Section 10783 of the Water Code, but the well stimulation treatment shall not commence until the state board or the regional water board approves the area-specific groundwater monitoring program.

(4) The well stimulation treatment permit shall expire one year from the date that the permit is issued.

(5) Within five business days of issuing a permit to perform a well stimulation treatment, the division shall provide a copy of
 the permit to the appropriate regional water quality control board or boards and to the local planning entity where the well, including its subsurface portion, is located. The division shall also post the permit on the publicly accessible portion of its internet website within five business days of issuing a permit.

(6) (A) It is the policy of the state that a copy of the approved well stimulation treatment permit and information on the available water sampling and testing be provided to every tenant of the surface property and every surface property owner or authorized agent of that owner whose property line location is one of the following:

(i) Within a 1,500 foot radius of the wellhead.

(ii) Within 500 feet from the horizontal projection of all subsurface portions of the designated well to the surface.

(B) (i) The well owner or operator shall identify the area requiring notification and shall contract with an independent entity or person who is responsible for, and shall perform, the notification required pursuant to subparagraph (A).

(ii) The independent entity or person shall identify the individuals notified, the method of notification, the date of the notification, a list of those notified, and shall provide a list of this information to the division.

(iii) The performance of the independent entity or persons shall be subject to review and audit by the division.

(C) A well stimulation treatment shall not commence before 30 calendar days after the permit copies pursuant to subparagraph (A) are provided.

(7) (A) A property owner notified pursuant to paragraph (6) may request water quality sampling and testing from a designated qualified contractor on any water well suitable for drinking or irrigation purposes and on any surface water suitable for drinking or irrigation purposes as follows:

(i) Baseline measurements before the commencement of the well stimulation treatment.

(ii) Followup measurements after the well stimulation treatment on the same schedule as the pressure testing of the well casing
 of the treated well.

(B) The State Water Resources Control Board shall designate one or more qualified independent third-party contractor or contractors that adhere to board-specified standards and protocols to perform the water sampling and testing. The well owner or operator shall pay for the sampling and testing. The sampling and testing performed shall be subject to audit and review by the State Water Resources Control Board or applicable regional water quality control board, as appropriate.

(C) The results of the water testing shall be provided to the division, appropriate regional water board, and the property owner or authorized agent. A tenant notified pursuant to paragraph (6) shall receive information on the results of the water testing to the extent
 authorized by the tenant’s lease and, where the tenant has lawful use of the ground or surface water identified in subparagraph (A), the tenant may independently contract for similar groundwater or surface water testing.

(8) The division shall retain a list of the entities and property owners notified pursuant to paragraphs (5) and (6).

(9) The operator shall provide notice to the division at least 72 hours before the actual start of the well stimulation treatment in order for the division to witness the treatment.

(e) The Secretary of the Natural Resources Agency shall notify the Joint Legislative Budget Committee and the Chairs of the Assembly Natural Resources, Senate Environmental Quality, and Senate Natural Resources and
 Water Committees on the progress of the independent scientific study on well stimulation and related activities. The first progress report shall be provided to the committees on or before April 1, 2014, and progress reports shall continue every four months thereafter until the independent study is completed, including a peer review of the study by independent scientific experts.

(f) If a well stimulation treatment is performed on a well, a supplier that performs any part of the stimulation or provides additives directly to the operator for a well stimulation treatment shall furnish the operator with information suitable for public disclosure needed for the operator to comply with subdivision (g). This information shall be provided as soon as possible but no later than 30 days following the conclusion of the well stimulation treatment.

(g) Within 60 days following cessation of a well stimulation treatment on a well, the operator shall post or cause to have posted to an internet website designated or maintained by the division and accessible to the public all of the well stimulation fluid composition and disposition information required to be collected pursuant to rules and regulations adopted under subdivision (b), including well identification number and location. This shall include the collected water quality data, which the operator shall report electronically to the State Water Resources Control Board.

(h) The operator is responsible for compliance with this section.

(i) (1) All geologic features within a distance reflecting an appropriate
 safety factor of the fracture zone for well stimulation treatments that fracture the formation and that have the potential to either limit or facilitate the migration of fluids outside of the fracture zone shall be identified and added to the well history. Geologic features include seismic faults identified by the California Geologic Survey.

(2) For purposes of this section, the “fracture zone” is defined as the volume surrounding the wellbore where fractures were created or enhanced by the well stimulation treatment. The safety factor shall be at least five and may vary depending upon geologic knowledge.

(3) The division shall review the geologic features important to assessing well stimulation treatments identified in the independent study pursuant to paragraph (5) of
 subdivision (a). Upon completion of the review, the division shall revise the regulations governing the reporting of geologic features pursuant to this subdivision accordingly.

(j) (1) Public disclosure of well stimulation treatment fluid information claimed to contain trade secrets is governed by Section 1060 of the Evidence Code, or the Uniform Trade Secrets Act (Title 5 (commencing with Section 3426) of Part 1 of Division 4 of the Civil Code), and the California Public Records Act (Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of Title 1 of the Government Code).

(2) Notwithstanding any other law or regulation, none of the following information shall be protected as a trade secret:

(A) The
 identities of the chemical constituents of additives, including CAS identification numbers.

(B) The concentrations of the additives in the well stimulation treatment fluids.

(C) Any air or other pollution monitoring data.

(D) Health and safety data associated with well stimulation treatment fluids.

(E) The chemical composition of the flowback fluid.

(3) If a trade secret claim is invalid or invalidated, the division shall release the information to the public by revising the information released pursuant to subdivision (g). The supplier shall notify the division of any change in status within 30
 days.

(4) (A) If a supplier believes that information regarding a chemical constituent of a well stimulation fluid is a trade secret, the supplier shall nevertheless disclose the information to the division in conjunction with a well stimulation treatment permit application, if not previously disclosed, within 30 days following cessation of a well stimulation on a well, and shall notify the division in writing of that belief.

(B) A trade secret claim shall not be made after initial disclosure of the information to the division.

(C) To comply with the public disclosure requirements of this section, the supplier shall indicate where trade secret information has been withheld and provide substitute
 information for public disclosure. The substitute information shall be a list, in any order, of the chemical constituents of the additive, including CAS identification numbers. The division shall review and approve the supplied substitute information.

(D) This subdivision does not permit a supplier to refuse to disclose the information required pursuant to this section to the division.

(5) In order to substantiate the trade secret claim, the supplier shall provide information to the division that shows all of the following:

(A) The extent to which the trade secret information is known by the supplier’s employees and others involved in the supplier’s business and outside the supplier’s business.

(B) The measures taken by the supplier to guard the secrecy of the trade secret information.

(C) The value of the trade secret information to the supplier and its competitors.

(D) The amount of effort or money the supplier expended developing the trade secret information and the ease or difficulty with which the trade secret information could be acquired or duplicated by others.

(6) If the division determines that the information provided in support of a request for trade secret protection pursuant to paragraph (5) is incomplete, the division shall notify the supplier and the supplier shall have 30 days to complete the submission. An incomplete
 submission does not meet the substantive criteria for trade secret designation.

(7) If the division determines that the information provided in support of a request for trade secret protection does not meet the substantive criteria for trade secret designation, the department shall notify the supplier by certified mail of its determination. The division shall release the information to the public, but not earlier than 60 days after the date of mailing the determination, unless, before the expiration of the 60-day period, the supplier obtains an action in an appropriate court for a declaratory judgment that the information is subject to protection or for a preliminary injunction prohibiting disclosure of the information to the public and provides notice to the division of the court order.

(8) The supplier is not required to disclose trade secret information to the operator.

(9) Upon receipt of a request for the release of trade secret information to the public, the following procedure applies:

(A) The division shall notify the supplier of the request in writing by certified mail, return receipt requested.

(B) The division shall release the information to the public, but not earlier than 60 days after the date of mailing the notice of the request for information, unless, before the expiration of the 60-day period, the supplier obtains an action in an appropriate court for a declaratory judgment that the information is subject to protection or for a preliminary injunction prohibiting disclosure of the information
 to the public and provides notice to the division of that action.

(10) The division shall develop a timely procedure to provide trade secret information in the following circumstances:

(A) To an officer or employee of the division, the state, local governments, including, but not limited to, local air districts, or the United States, in connection with the official duties of that officer or employee, to a health professional under any law for the protection of health, or to contractors with the division or other government entities and their employees if, in the opinion of the division, disclosure is necessary and required for the satisfactory performance of a contract, for performance of work, or to protect health and safety.

(B) To a health professional in the event of an emergency or to diagnose or treat a patient.

(C) In order to protect public health, to any health professional, toxicologist, or epidemiologist who is employed in the field of public health and who provides a written statement of need. The written statement of need shall include the public health purposes of the disclosure and shall explain the reason the disclosure of the specific chemical and its concentration is required.

(D) A health professional may share trade secret information with other persons as may be professionally necessary, in order to diagnose or treat a patient, including, but not limited to, the patient and other health professionals, subject to state and federal laws restricting disclosure of medical
 records including, but not limited to, Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 56.10) of Part 2.6 of Division 1 of the Civil Code.

(E) For purposes of this paragraph, “health professional” means any person licensed or certified pursuant to Division 2 (commencing with Section 500) of the Business and Professions Code, the Osteopathic Initiative Act, the Chiropractic Initiative Act, or the Emergency Medical Services System and the Prehospital Emergency Medical Care Personnel Act (Division 2.5 (commencing with Section 1797) of the Health and Safety Code).

(F) A person in possession of, or having access to, confidential trade secret information pursuant to this subdivision may disclose this information to any person who is authorized to receive it. A written confidentiality agreement shall
 not be required.

(k) A well granted confidential status pursuant to Section 3234 shall not be required to disclose well stimulation treatment fluid information pursuant to subdivision (g) until the confidential status of the well ceases. Notwithstanding the confidential status of a well, it is public information that a well will be or has been subject to a well stimulation treatment.

(l) The division shall perform random periodic spot check inspections to ensure that the information provided on well stimulation treatments is accurately reported, including that the estimates provided before the commencement of the well stimulation treatment are reasonably consistent with the well history.

(m) Where the division
 shares jurisdiction over a well or the well stimulation treatment on a well with a federal entity, the division’s rules and regulations shall apply in addition to all applicable federal laws and regulations.

(n) This article does not relieve the division or any other agency from complying with any other provision of existing laws, regulations, and orders.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 615, Sec. 367.   (AB 474)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Operative January 1, 2023, pursuant to Sec. 463 of Stats. 2021, Ch. 615.)
-------------------------------------------

3161.

(a) The division shall finalize the regulations governing this article on or before January 1, 2015. Notwithstanding any other laws, the regulations shall become effective on July 1, 2015.

(b) The division shall allow, until regulations specified in subdivision (b) of Section 3160 are finalized and implemented, and upon written notification by an operator, all of the activities defined in Section 3157, provided all of the following conditions are met:

(1) The owner or operator certifies compliance with paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of, paragraphs (1), (6), and (7) of subdivision (d) of, and paragraph (1) of subdivision (g) of, Section 3160.

(2) The owner or operator shall provide a complete well history, incorporating the information required by Section 3160, to the division on or before March 1, 2015.

(3) (A) The division commences the preparation of an environmental impact report (EIR) pursuant to the California Environmental Quality Act (Division 13 (commencing with Section 21000)), to provide the public with detailed information regarding any potential environmental impacts of well stimulation in the state.

(B) Any environmental review conducted by the division shall fully comply with both of the following requirements:

(i) The EIR shall be certified by the division as the lead agency, no later than July 1, 2015.

(ii) The EIR shall address the issue of activities that may be conducted as defined in Section 3157 and that may occur at oil wells in the state existing prior to, and after, January 1, 2014.

(C) This paragraph does not prohibit a local lead agency from conducting its own EIR.

(4) The division ensures that all activities pursuant to this section fully conform with this article and other applicable provisions of law on or before December 31, 2015, through a permitting process.

(c) The division has the emergency regulatory authority to implement the purposes of this section. Notwithstanding Section 11349.6 of the Government Code or other laws, an emergency regulation adopted pursuant to this subdivision implementing subdivision (b) shall be filed with, but shall not be disapproved by, the Office of
 Administrative Law, and shall remain in effect until revised by the director or July 1, 2015, whichever is earlier.

(d) This section does not limit the authority of the division to take appropriate action pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 3106.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 35, Sec. 131.   (SB 861)   Effective June 20, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3.5. Natural Gas Storage Wells [3180. - 3187.]

3180.

(a) As used in this article, “gas storage well” means an active or idle well used primarily to inject natural gas into or withdraw natural gas from an underground natural gas storage facility.

(b) On or before January 1, 2018, the operators of all gas storage wells shall have commenced a mechanical integrity testing regime specified by the division. The testing regime shall include all of the following:

(1) Regular leak testing.

(2) Casing wall thickness inspection.

(3) Pressure test of the production
 casing.

(4) Any additional testing deemed necessary by the division to demonstrate the integrity of the well.

(c) All anomalies identified in the testing shall be immediately reported to the appropriate district office and explained to the supervisor’s satisfaction.

(d) (1) The division shall promulgate regulations that establish standards for the design, construction, and maintenance of all gas storage wells to ensure that integrity concerns with a gas storage well are identified and addressed before they can become a threat to life, health, property, the climate, or natural resources.

(2) The regulations shall require that gas storage wells be designed, constructed, and maintained to ensure that a single point of failure does not
 pose an immediate threat of loss of control of fluids, as determined by the supervisor.

(3) In developing the regulations, the division shall consider enhanced design, construction, and maintenance measures that could meet the standard in paragraph (2), including any of the following:

(A) Primary and secondary mechanical well barriers to isolate the storage gas within the storage reservoir and transfer storage gas from the surface into and out of the storage reservoir.

(B) Production casing to the surface with the required integrity to contain reservoir pressure.

(C) Tubing and packer and production tree with the required integrity to contain reservoir pressure.

(D) Surface controlled
 subsurface safety valves or Christmas tree valves with the required integrity to contain reservoir pressure that halt flow through the well.

(E) Secondary barrier with overlapping cement casing between two concentric casings with good quality cement bond.

(F) Wellhead with annular valves and seals and the required integrity to contain reservoir pressure.

(G) Casing with a hanger and seal assembly.

(H) Any other well construction requirements the supervisor determines would improve the protection of public health, safety, the environment, and natural resources.

(4) In developing the regulations, the division shall develop a schedule for ongoing mechanical integrity testing.

(e) In order to facilitate consistency, standardization, and training for site inspection and maintenance, to the extent that the regulations promulgated by the division pursuant to subdivision (d) address surface equipment associated with an underground gas storage facility, the division shall ensure that those regulations are consistent with comparable requirements in Parts 190 to 199, inclusive, of Title 49 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 673, Sec. 3.   (SB 887)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

3181.

(a) The operator of a gas storage well shall submit for the supervisor’s approval the following materials:

(1) Data describing the gas storage project and gas storage wells that demonstrate that stored gas will be confined to the approved zone or zones. Updated data shall be provided to the division if conditions change or if more accurate data become available.

(2) A risk management plan to identify and plan for mitigation of all threats and hazards and potential threats and hazards associated with gas storage well operation in order to ensure internal and external mechanical integrity of a well, including site-specific information. The
 risk management plan shall provide for regular review and revision, as needed, to ensure the plan appropriately reflects current conditions. The risk management plan shall include, but is not limited to, all of the following:

(A) A natural gas leak prevention and response program that addresses the full range of natural gas leaks possible at the facility with specific response plans that provide for immediate control of the leak. The operator shall consult with local emergency response entities on the response plans. The prevention and response program shall include, but is not limited to, all of the following:

(i) A protocol for public notice of a large, uncontrollable leak to any potentially impacted community, as defined in the risk management plan, if the leak cannot be controlled within 48 hours of discovery by the operator.

(ii) Prepositioning, as feasible, and identification of materials and personnel necessary to respond to leaks. This shall include materials and equipment to respond to and stop the leak itself as well as to protect public health.

(iii) The identification of personnel responsible for notifying regulatory authorities with jurisdiction over the range of leaks possible.

(B) A plan for corrosion monitoring and evaluation.

(C) A schedule for regular well and reservoir integrity assessments.

(D) An assessment of the risks associated with the gas storage well and its operation.

(E) Planned risk mitigation efforts.

(F) A regular maintenance program for the well and the portion of the facility within the division’s jurisdiction. The maintenance program shall include training for site personnel and proactive replacement of equipment at risk of failure to ensure safe operation.

(3) In addition to other factors deemed relevant by the supervisor, the risk management plan required in paragraph (2) shall consider all of the following:

(A) The facility’s distance from dwellings, other buildings intended for human occupancy, or other well-defined outside areas where people may assemble such as campgrounds, recreational areas, or playgrounds.

(B) The risks to and from the well related to roadways, rights of way, railways, airports, and industrial facilities.

(C) Proximity to environmentally or culturally sensitive areas.

(D) The risks of well sabotage.

(E) The current and predicted development of the surrounding area.

(F) Topography and local wind patterns.

(b) All of the materials described in subdivision (a) shall be reported to the division according to a schedule approved by the supervisor. The operator shall not deviate from the programs, plans, and other conditions and protocols contained in the materials without prior written approval by the supervisor.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 673, Sec. 3.   (SB 887)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

3181.5.

(a) (1) The operator of a gas storage well shall provide to the division a complete chemical inventory of the materials, of any phase, that may be emitted from the gas storage well in the event of a reportable leak, as defined for purposes of Section 3183, periodically, as determined by the division, but no less than annually. For purposes of this section, material includes, but is not limited to, the composition of formation fluids, gas in the storage reservoir, wellbore-produced fluids, and all well maintenance and
 control materials, including well kill fluids, placed in the well.
 For purposes of this section, fluids include suspended or entrained solids.

(2) The division shall consider information collected pursuant to its existing regulations when determining what information satisfies the requirements of this section.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), in the event of a reportable leak, as defined for purposes of Section 3183, the operator of a gas storage well shall provide to the division the composition of well kill
 fluids within five days of their use in a leaking gas storage well and any updates to the information reported pursuant to subdivision (a) to ensure that it is current.

(c) The information provided pursuant to this section shall be provided with sufficient accuracy and precision as determined by the division, in consultation with the Office of Environmental Health Hazard Assessment and other relevant health experts, to inform the determination of public health impacts from the release of these materials to the environment.

(d) If an operator subject to this section is unable to obtain information about a chemical from the chemical’s supplier for any reason, including, but not limited to, assertion by the chemical supplier of trade secret protections, the division may require the supplier to furnish that information to the division.

(e) In the event of a reportable leak, as defined for purposes of Section 3183, the division shall post the information related to the reportable leak received pursuant to this section on its internet
 website.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 773, Sec. 3.   (SB 463)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

3182.

On a weekly basis, the division shall post a list of notices received pursuant to Section 3203 on the division’s Internet Web site. Copies of any notice shall be provided to members of the public upon request.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 673, Sec. 3.   (SB 887)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

3183.

(a) The division, in consultation with the State Air Resources Board, shall determine and adopt by regulation what constitutes a reportable leak from a gas storage well and the timeframe for reporting that leak. The regulations shall require an operator to immediately report to the division a leak that poses a significant present or potential hazard to public health and safety, property, or to the environment.

(b) Until the regulations pursuant to subdivision (a) are in effect, a leak of any size from a gas storage well shall be deemed a reportable leak, and the operator shall notify the division immediately.

(c) If a leak from a gas storage well that is reported to the division pursuant to subdivision (a) or (b), as applicable, cannot be controlled within 48 hours, the division shall post information about the leak on its internet website and provide regular updates to the public until the leak is stopped.

(d) The division, in consultation with the State Air Resources Board, shall review and, if necessary, revise the regulations developed pursuant to subdivision (a) no less than once every 10 years.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 773, Sec. 4.   (SB 463)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

3184.

(a) Within 72 hours of being notified of a reportable leak, pursuant to Section 3183, the supervisor shall determine if the reportable leak poses a significant present or potential hazard to public health and safety, property, or to the environment such that a relief well is necessary. If the supervisor makes that determination, the operator shall immediately begin preparation for, and, as soon as practicable at the determination of the supervisor, commence the drilling of, a relief well.

(b) Nothing in subdivision (a) shall prevent the supervisor from making a determination after the initial 72-hour period that a reportable leak poses a significant hazard to public health and safety, property, or to
 the environment and that a relief well is necessary. If the supervisor makes that determination, the operator shall immediately begin preparation for, and, as soon as practicable at the determination of the supervisor, commence the drilling of, a relief well.

(c) If the operator is required to drill a relief well under subdivision (a) or (b), the operator’s efforts to drill the relief well shall continue until the reportable leak has been stopped and the cause of the reportable leak has been fully addressed or the supervisor determines that other means of controlling the reportable leak are appropriate.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 673, Sec. 3.   (SB 887)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

3185.

The division shall perform unannounced random onsite inspections of some gas storage wells annually. The results shall be posted and available to the public on the division’s Internet Web site.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 673, Sec. 3.   (SB 887)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

3186.

An operator of a gas storage well shall develop and maintain a comprehensive gas storage well training and mentoring program for those employees whose job duties involve the safety of operations and maintenance of gas storage wells and associated equipment. The training program shall include, but is not limited to, gas storage well operations, including best practices to prevent leaks, maintenance and testing, gas storage well safety regulations, emergency response, and incident reporting. If storage field employees are represented by a labor union, the operator shall consult with the relevant union local on safety issues and, when requested, establish a framework to provide training through a joint labor-management training program.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 673, Sec. 3.   (SB 887)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

3186.3.

On or before July 1, 2021, in response to the independent root cause analysis of the 2015 well leak at the Aliso Canyon gas storage facility prepared by Blade Energy Partners dated May 16, 2019, and ordered by the supervisor and the Public Utilities Commission, the division shall review and, if necessary, revise its natural gas storage well policy and regulations to address the root causes identified. At a minimum, the division shall evaluate and consider all of the following:

(a) Requirements for cathodic protection measures for well casings, where appropriate, on a well-by-well or field-by-field basis.

(b) Requirements for well control plans for a gas storage field, that include the range of flow properties possible in the event of an uncontrolled well
 release.

(c) Requirements for investigating leaks and other pressure equipment integrity incidents that present a risk of leaks as determined by the division. This shall include reporting requirements to the division.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 773, Sec. 5.   (SB 463)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

3187.

All materials provided to the division and approved by the supervisor to comply with Sections 3181, 3184, and 3185 shall be posted and available to the public on the Internet Web site of the division in a timely manner.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 673, Sec. 3.   (SB 887)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3.6. Gravity-Based Energy Storage Well Pilot Program [3190. - 3190.9.]

3190.

For purposes of this article, the following definitions apply:

(a) “Federal agency” means the United States Environmental Protection Agency, including Region 9 of that agency.

(b) (1) “Gravity-based energy storage well” means a well that meets all of the following:

(A) The well is plugged with all perforations sealed, including by the use of permanent bridge plug.

(B) The well is
 isolated from a hydrocarbon reservoir.

(C) The well has mechanical integrity.

(D) The well is not a conduit for fluid migration into a beneficial use aquifer.

(E) The well is exclusively used to store or generate energy by raising or lowering a weight within the well casing.

(2) A well that has been fully plugged and abandoned pursuant to Section 3208 is not eligible to be a gravity-based energy storage well.
